Hawaii, session 2026, HB2201.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 209E-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending the definition of "eligible business activity" to read as follows: ""Eligible business activity" means the: (1)  Manufacture of tangible personal property, the wholesale sale of tangible personal property as described in section 237-4, or a service business as defined in this section; (2)  Production of agricultural products where the business is a producer as defined in section 237-5, or the processing of agricultural products, all or some of which were grown within an enterprise zone; (3)  Research, development, sale, or production of all types of genetically-engineered medical, agricultural, or maritime biotechnology products; [or] (4)  Production of electric power from wind energy for sale primarily to a public utility company for resale to the public; (5)  Operation of a recycling facility, as defined in section 342G-101; or (6)  Film production or operation of a film studio; provided that medical cannabis dispensary activities pursuant to chapter 329D shall not be considered an eligible business activity for the purposes of this chapter." SECTION 2.  Section 209E-4, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  The governor, upon the recommendation of the director, shall approve the designation of up to [six] eight areas in each county as enterprise zones for a period of twenty years.  Any such area shall be located in one United States census tract or two or more contiguous United States census tracts in accordance with the most recent decennial United States Census.  The census tract or tracts within which each enterprise zone is located also shall meet at least one of the following criteria: (1)  Twenty-five per cent or more of the population have incomes below eighty per cent of the median family income of the county; or (2)  The unemployment rate is 1.5 times the state average." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________